Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2895.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-701.05, to read: START_STATUTE15-701.05. Native American language courses; high school graduation requirement A. If the state board of education or a school district or charter school includes in the minimum course of study for the graduation of students from high school prescribed pursuant to section 15-701.01 a requirement that students receive instruction in a world language, the state board of education, school district or charter school shall allow students to satisfy the requirement by demonstrating proficiency in a Native American language. B. This section does not require a school district or charter school to offer a native American language course. C. The state board of education may establish criteria for evaluating the Native American LANGUAGE proficiency of students. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.